hr-HR: Dizajn slojeva: Dvoslojno; Obostrano; Jednoslojno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Zasnova slojev: Dvoslojno; Dvostransko; Enoslojno; Drugo
zh-CN: 分层设计: 双层; 双面可用; 单层; 其他
el: Σχεδιασμός στρώσεων: Διπλή στρώση; Διπλής όψης; Μονή στρώση; Άλλο
ro-RO: Designul stratului: Strat dublu; Reversibil; Un singur strat; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на слоевете: Двуслоен; Двулицев; Еднослоен; Друг
fi: Kerrossuunnittelu: Kaksikerroksinen; Käännettävä; Yksikerroksinen; Muu
sv: Lagerdesign: Dubbelt lager; Vändbar; Enkelt lager; Övrigt
ru: Конструкция слоев: Двухслойный; Двусторонний; Однослойный; Другое
hu: Rétegkialakítás: Kétrétegű; Kifordítható; Egyrétegű; Egyéb
it: Struttura a strati: Doppio strato; Reversibile; Singolo strato; Altro
th: การออกแบบเลเยอร์: สองชั้น; ใส่ได้สองด้าน; ชั้นเดียว; อื่นๆ
de: Schichtdesign: Doppellagig; Wendbar; Einlagig; Sonstige
da: Lagdesign: Dobbeltlag; Vendbar; Enkeltlag; Andet
pl: Konstrukcja warstwowa: Podwójna warstwa; Dwustronna; Pojedyncza warstwa; Inne
nb: Lagdesign: Dobbelt lag; Vendbar; Enkelt lag; Annet
nl: Laag ontwerp: Dubbellaags; Omkeerbaar; Enkellaags; Overig
tr: Katman tasarımı: Çift katmanlı; Çift taraflı; Tek katmanlı; Diğer
lt-LT: Sluoksnių dizainas: Dvigubas sluoksnis; Dvipusis; Vienas sluoksnis; Kita
zh-TW: 分層設計: 雙層; 雙面; 單層; 其他
ko: 레이어 디자인: 이중 레이어; 양면; 단일 레이어; 기타
en: Layer design: Double layer; Reversible; Single layer; Other
es: Diseño de capas: Doble capa; Reversible; Capa simple; Otro
cs: Návrh vrstev: Dvojitá vrstva; Oboustranné; Jedna vrstva; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế lớp: Lớp kép; Hai mặt; Lớp đơn; Khác
sk-SK: Konštrukcia vrstiev: Dvojvrstvové; Obojstranné; Jednovrstvové; Iné
fr: Structure des couches: Double couche; Réversible; Couche simple; Autre
ja: レイヤーデザイン: ダブルレイヤー; リバーシブル; シングルレイヤー; その他
pt-PT: Design das camadas: Dupla camada; Reversível; Camada única; Outro
pt-BR: Design de camadas: Camada dupla; Reversível; Camada única; Outro